New Jersey, session 221, A1449.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A construction services contract or agreement, the cost or contract price whereof is to be paid with or out of public funds or out of college funds, as applicable, awarded in accordance with the Local Public Contracts Law, P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-1 et seq.), the Public School Contracts Law, N.J.S.18A:18A-1 et seq., the State College Contracts Law, P.L.1986, c.43 (18A:64-52 et seq.), R.S.52:32-2, or P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-6 et seq.) shall require errors and omissions insurance. A copy of the insurance policy shall be provided to the government entity or entities included in the construction services contract or agreement.  The contract or agreement shall be subject to the provisions of P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.) and all of its exemptions, commonly known as the open public records act, and the declarations page, or its substantial equivalent, shall be made available to the public on the official website of the Department of the Treasury, Department of Community Affairs, or Department of Education, as appropriate, and the official website of the municipality the construction is to take place. As used in this section, construction services means civil design, mechanical engineering, electrical engineering, plumbing design, and structural engineering 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.